Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-4,134
Holder of Class A commercial driver's license; hazardous materials endorsement not required; conditions.

In conformance with section 7208 of the federal Fixing America's Surface Transportation Act and 49 C.F.R. 383.3(i), as such section and regulation existed on the date specified in section 60-201, no hazardous materials endorsement authorizing the holder of a Class A commercial driver's license to operate a commercial motor vehicle transporting diesel fuel shall be required if such driver is (1) operating within the state and acting within the scope of his or her employment as an employee of a custom harvester operation, an agrichemical business, a farm retail outlet and supplier, or a livestock feeder and (2) operating a service vehicle that is (a) transporting diesel in a quantity of one thousand gallons or less and (b) clearly marked with a flammable or combustible placard, as appropriate.

Laws 2018, LB909, § 90;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 15;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 60;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 13;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 59;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 26;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 34;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 43.